Hawaii statutes.
[§346C-3] Composition of the board. (a)
The board of trustees of the long-term care financing program shall consist of five
regular members and one ex officio[,] nonvoting member to be appointed by the
governor as provided in section 26-34; provided that:

(1) The terms of members shall be six years; and

(2) The initial appointments may be staggered in
accordance with section 26-34(a).

[(b)] The members of the board of trustees shall have experience in accounting, business,
finance, law, or other similar fields, and experience equivalent to five years
as an officer or manager of a viable business, community, or organization
involved with insurance management, portfolio management, health care
management, or similar field. The composition of the board of trustees shall
represent a diversity of relevant experience.

[(c)] The
board of trustees shall elect a chairperson from among themselves. The
trustees shall serve without compensation. [L 2002, c 245, pt of §2]

Attorney General
Opinions

Cited, in determining that in the absence of other statutory
wording to the contrary, the holdover provision from §26-34(b) would apply to
board and commission statutes that refer to §26-34 and that the provision is
constitutional. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next